verbo/espanol_verbo_pret_imp.foma
define PretImpIndYo1 [a r "*"] -> [a  b a] || _ "1";
define PretImpIndTu1 [a r "*"] -> [a b a s] || _ "2";
define PretImpIndElla1 [a r "*"] -> [a b a] || _ "3";
define PretImpIndNos1 [a r "*"] -> [á b a m o s] || _ "4";
define PretImpIndVos1 [a r "*"] -> [a b a i s] || _ "5";
define PretImpIndUst1 [a r "*"] -> [a b a n] || _ "6";

define PretImpIndYo2 [e r "*"] -> {ía} || _ "1";
define PretImpIndTu2 [e r "*"] -> {ías} || _ "2";
define PretImpIndElla2 [e r "*"] -> {ía} || _ "3";
define PretImpIndNos2 [e r "*"] -> {íamos} || _ "4";
define PretImpIndVos2 [e r "*"] -> {íais} || _ "5";
define PretImpIndUst2 [e r "*"] -> {ían} || _ "6";

define PretImpIndYo3 [i r "*"] -> {ía} || _ "1";
define PretImpIndTu3 [i r "*"] -> {ías} || _ "2";
define PretImpIndElla3 [i r "*"] -> {ía} || _ "3";
define PretImpIndNos3 [i r "*"] -> {íamos} || _ "4";
define PretImpIndVos3 [i r "*"] -> {íais} || _ "5";
define PretImpIndUst3 [i r "*"] -> {ían} || _ "6";

define PretImpInd1 PretImpIndYo1 .o. PretImpIndTu1 .o. PretImpIndElla1 .o. PretImpIndNos1 .o. PretImpIndVos1 .o. PretImpIndUst1;
define PretImpInd2 PretImpIndYo2 .o. PretImpIndTu2 .o. PretImpIndElla2 .o. PretImpIndNos2 .o. PretImpIndVos2 .o. PretImpIndUst2;
define PretImpInd3 PretImpIndYo3 .o. PretImpIndTu3 .o. PretImpIndElla3 .o. PretImpIndNos3 .o. PretImpIndVos3 .o. PretImpIndUst3;

define PretImpInd PretImpInd1 .o. PretImpInd2 .o. PretImpInd3;
